Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 to 8 of this  2017 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 346.510
to 346.570.
SECTION 2. (1) The Commission for the Blind shall establish in the State Treasury a fund
from the net proceeds of the operation of vending facilities. Moneys deposited into the  fund,
including the interest earned, shall be credited to a  special checking account, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Disbursement from the account may be made by  check
signed by the person designated  by the commission. Interest earned by the account shall be
credited to the account.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall be used for the  purposes of, and are continuously appropri-
ated to the commission for:
(a) Maintaining and replacing equipment;
(b) Purchasing new equipment;
(c) Management services, including but not limited to management training services;
(d) Ensuring a fair minimum of return to vending facility managers; and
(e) Retirement or pension funds, health insurance contributions and, if determined by  a
vote of vending facility managers, paid sick leave and vacation time.
(3) The commission shall provide to the Governor and  to vending facility managers
quarterly reports of the account established under this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Commission for the  Blind shall collect a percentage of net proceeds
earned by a vending facility. The moneys collected under this section shall be deposited  into
the fund established under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The commission shall determine by rule the standard percentage of  net proceeds to
be collected under this  section. The commission shall provide in an agreement with a vending
facility manager the percentage  of net proceeds that the commission will collect from the
vending facility  manager under this section. The commission shall reduce, but not below a
percentage determined by the commission by rule, the percentage  collected by the following
amounts:
(a)(A) Four percentage points if the  vending facility offers exclusively healthy vending
items or local vending items;
Enrolled House Bill 3253 (HB 3253-B) Page 1
(B) Three percentage points if at least 75 percent but less than  100 percent of the offer-
ings at the vending facility are healthy vending items or local vending items; or
(C) Two percentage points if at least 50 percent but less than 75 percent of  the offerings
at the vending facility are healthy vending items or local vending items;
(b) Two percentage points if the vending facility  employs at least one person who is blind,
in addition to the vending facility manager;
(c) One percentage point for each person who is blind and is employed by the vending
facility in addition to the persons described in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(d) One percentage point if the  vending facility employs at least one person with a disa-
bility, as defined  in ORS 174.107, or who is a veteran, as defined in ORS 408.225, in addition
to the vending facility manager; and
(e) One-half of one percentage point for each person with a disability or veteran employed
by the vending facility  in addition to the persons described in paragraph (d) of this sub-
section.
SECTION 4.  Section 3 of this 2017 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) The Commission  for the Blind shall collect a percentage of net proceeds earned by
a vending facility. The moneys collected under  this section shall be deposited into the fund estab-
lished under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The commission shall determine by rule , and shall state in an agreement with a vending
facility manager,  the [ standard] percentage of net proceeds to be collected under  this section.
[The commission shall provide in an  agreement with a vending facility manager the percentage of net
proceeds that the commission will  collect from the vending facility manager under this section. The
commission shall reduce, but not below a percentage determined by the commission by  rule, the per-
centage collected by the following amounts: ]
[(a)(A) Four percentage points if the vending facility offers exclusively healthy  vending items or
local vending items; ]
[(B) Three percentage points if at least 75 percent but less than 100 percent of the offerings at  the
vending facility are healthy vending items or local vending items; or ]
[(C) Two percentage points  if at least 50 percent but less than 75 percent of the offerings at the
vending facility are healthy vending items or local vending items; ]
[(b) Two percentage points if the vending facility employs at least one  person who is blind, in ad-
dition to the vending facility manager; ]
[(c) One percentage point for each person who is blind  and is employed by the vending facility in
addition to the persons described in paragraph (b) of this subsection; ]
[(d) One percentage point if the vending facility employs at least  one person with a disability, as
defined in ORS 174.107, or who is a veteran, as defined in ORS  408.225, in addition to the vending
facility manager; and ]
[(e) One-half of one percentage point for each  person with a disability or veteran employed by the
vending facility in addition to the persons described in paragraph (d) of this subsection. ]
SECTION 5. (1) The Commission for the Blind shall adopt by rule a vending facility
manager statement of full-time employment  with which a vending facility manager shall
comply. The statement must describe the responsibilities of a  vending facility manager, in-
cluding, but not limited to, responsibilities regarding:
(a) Weekly contact requirements with employees or subcontractors of the manager;
(b) Vending facility inspections; and
(c) The development and maintenance of work logs.
(2) The commission shall include the active participation, as described in  section 8 of this
2017 Act, of the commission’s business enterprise consumer committee, in developing the
statement described in this section.
SECTION 6.
(1) With written  approval from the Commission for the Blind, a vending fa-
cility manager may enter into an agreement with a subcontractor included on the list of
Enrolled House Bill 3253 (HB 3253-B) Page 2
approved subcontractors described in subsection (4) of this section in  order to enable the
manager to operate the vending facility.
(2) In determining whether to approve an agreement  with a subcontractor, the commis-
sion shall consider:
(a) The quality  of service that the vending facility manager and subcontractor are able
to provide; and
(b) Any product storage requirements.
(3) The commission may provide  in an agreement with a vending facility manager that
the commission may increase the  percentage of net proceeds collected under section 3 of this
2017 Act from a vending facility  manager who enters into an agreement with a subcontractor
under this section.
(4)(a) The commission shall establish  a list of approved subcontractors with which a
vending facility manager may enter into an agreement.
(b) The business enterprise  consumer committee shall actively participate in developing
the criteria for approval of subcontractors.
(c) The commission shall consult  with the Department of Administrative Services in es-
tablishing the list.
(d) The commission may,  through a procurement process with the department, revise the
list as necessary.
(e) The commission may, in approving subcontractors,  give preference to subcontractors
that provide  healthy vending items or local vending items and that employ persons with
disabilities, as defined in ORS 174.107, and veterans, as defined in ORS 408.225.
(f) An agreement with an approved subcontractor is subject  to ORS chapter 279A and
ORS chapter 279B.
(5) The commission may determine by rule the services or products that a subcontractor
may provide and the extent to which a subcontractor may  perform the duties of a vending
facility manager, consistent with the vending facility manager statement  of full-time em-
ployment described in section 5 of this 2017 Act.
(6)(a) A vending  facility manager who enters into an agreement with a subcontractor
under this section is solely responsible for fulfilling the  requirements of the vending facility
manager statement described in  section 5 of this 2017 Act and for meeting any obligations
arising from agreements into which  the vending facility manager has entered for the purpose
of managing  the vending facility. Unless the commission gives written approval, an agree-
ment between a vending  facility manager and a subcontractor may not include any provision
that imposes liability on the commission or that obligates the  commission to the subcon-
tractor.
(b) The commission may not be held liable for claims of any nature, including claims  for
injunctive or declaratory relief, that arise out of  any agreement or subcontract between a
vending facility manager and a subcontractor.
(7) The commission, with the active  participation of the business enterprise consumer
committee, may adopt rules relating to the assignment of  a vending facility manager to
manage a vending facility.
SECTION 7.
The surviving spouse  or domestic partner of a vending facility manager who
is deceased or who becomes incapacitated by a physical or  mental illness may continue to
operate the vending facility formerly operated  by the original vending facility manager for
up to six months after the date of  death or incapacitation, or until the date on which the
operating agreement expires, whichever is sooner, for  the purpose of winding down the op-
erations of the vending facility.
SECTION 8. (1) The Commission for the Blind shall ensure the active participation  of the
commission’s business enterprise consumer committee in the commission’s major adminis-
trative, policy and program development decisions that  impact the commission’s business
enterprise program.
Enrolled House Bill 3253 (HB 3253-B) Page 3
(2) The commission shall provide relevant data and information to the committee in a
timely manner in order to effectuate the committee’s active participation.
(3) The commission has final authority and responsibility  for the administration and op-
eration of the business enterprise program.
(4) If the commission  does not follow a recommendation of the committee regarding a
matter on which the committee  actively participates, the commission shall provide to the
committee a written explanation as to the reason the committee’s recommendation was  not
followed.
SECTION 9. (1) The Commission for the Blind may, in the discretion of  the commission
or if requested by a vending facility manager licensed under  ORS 346.510 to 346.570, aid per-
sons with visual impairments by supplying to a  person with a visual impairment materials,
equipment or machinery, or by allowing the manager  to subcontract with a third party to
obtain materials, equipment or machinery, in order to enable  the operation of a vending fa-
cility.
(2) The commission may transfer to the person with  a visual impairment ownership of
any materials, equipment or machinery owned by  the commission and supplied to the person.
SECTION 10. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Political subdivision” has the meaning given that term in ORS 346.510.
(b) “Vending facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 346.510.
(2) This state shall grant to persons who are blind a:
(a) Priority to establish and operate  vending facilities, other than cafeterias and in
community colleges, in public buildings in this state.
(b) Preference to operate cafeterias, and vending facilities in community colleges,  in
public buildings in this state.
(3) If a  state agency, department or political subdivision constructs a new public building
or facility, modifies an  existing public building or facility, enters into or modifies a contract
for, or otherwise seeks to procure, products or services that are  customarily provided by the
business enterprise program of the Commission for the Blind, including the  operation of
vending facilities, the agency, department or political subdivision complies with:
(a) Subsection (2)(a) of this section if the agency, department or political subdivision:
(A) Notifies the commission  of the intended action and allows the commission to deter-
mine whether a vending facility manager licensed under ORS 346.510 to 346.570 is able to
provide the product or service;
(B) Offers to the commission a right of first refusal;
(C) Does not charge the commission or vending facility manager any amount  prohibited
under ORS 346.520 (2); and
(D) Procures the vending service from the commission if the service:
(i) Is offered by the commission or  by persons with visual impairments under the direc-
tion and supervision of the commission; and
(ii) Meets the requirements of the agency, department  or political subdivision for quality
and quantity of food stuffs and beverages available through the vending facility.
(b) Subsection (2)(b) of this section if the agency, department or political subdivision:
(A) Notifies the commission  of the intended action and allows the commission to deter-
mine whether a vending facility manager licensed under ORS 346.510 to 346.570 is able to
provide the product or service; and
(B) Procures the vending service from the commission if the service:
(i) Is offered by the commission or by persons  with visual impairments under the direc-
tion and supervision of the commission;
(ii) Meets the requirements of the agency, department  or political subdivision for quality
and quantity of food stuffs and beverages available through the vending facility; and
(iii) Is offered in a bid that is equal to any other bids submitted.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 346.290 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3253 (HB 3253-B) Page 4
346.290. (1) There is established in the General  Fund of the State Treasury an account to be
known as the Commission for the Blind  Account. Except for funds made available to the Commission
for the Blind under ORS  346.270 or  deposited pursuant to [ ORS 346.540 ] section 2 of this 2017
Act, all moneys received by the  commission for promoting the welfare of persons with visual
impairments shall be paid into the State Treasury and  credited to the Commission for the Blind
Account.
(2) All  moneys in the Commission for the Blind Account are continuously appropriated to the
commission for use by the commission for the respective purposes authorized by law.
(3) The commission shall keep a record  of all moneys deposited in the Commission for the Blind
Account. The record shall indicate by separate cumulative accounts the source from which  the
moneys are derived and the individual  activity or program against which each withdrawal is
charged.
SECTION 12.  ORS 346.510 is amended to read:
346.510. As used in ORS 346.510 to 346.570[ , the term ]:
(1) “Cafeteria” means a food-dispensing facility:
(a) That can provide a variety of prepared foods and beverages;
(b) Where a patron may move through a self-service line;
(c) That may employ some servers to wait on patrons; and
(d) That provides seating suitable for patrons to consume meals.
(2) “Healthy vending item” and “local vending item”  have the meanings given those
terms by rules adopted by the Commission for the Blind in consultation with the Public
Health Director and the business enterprise consumer committee.
[(1) “Operator” means the individual person who is blind and who  is responsible for the day-to-day
conduct of the vending facility operation. ]
[(2)] (3) “Person who is blind” means a person [ having] who has  not more than 20/200 visual
acuity in the better eye with  best correction or whose visual acuity, if better than 20/200, is ac-
companied by a limit  to the field of vision to such a degree that its widest diameter subtends an
angle of no greater than 20 degrees[ . Such  blindness shall be ] and whose blindness is  certified by
a licensed physician who specializes in diseases of the eye.
(4) “Political subdivision” means a local government as  defined in ORS 174.116, a
municipality, town or village of this state.
[(3)] (5) “Public building” or “property” means [ any] a  building, land or  other real property,  or
a portion of a building, land or other real property,  that is owned, leased , managed or occupied
by [ any] a department or an agency of the State of Oregon or [ any of its political subdivisions ] by
a political subdivision, except  for a  public elementary [ and] school, a secondary [ schools] school,
a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or  a public corporation created pursuant to ORS
353.020.
[(4)] (6) “Vending facility” means:
(a) [ Such] Shelters, counters, shelving,  display and wall cases, refrigerating apparatus and other
appropriate auxiliary equipment [ as] that are  necessary or customarily used for the vending of [ such
articles as may  be ] articles, including an established mix of healthy vending items  approved by
the Commission for the Blind  and the agency [ having care, custody and control of the building or
property in or  on which ], department or political subdivision charged with maintaining the
public building or property where the vending facility is located;
(b) Manual or coin-operated vending machines or similar devices for vending [ such] articles ,
including machines or devices that accept electronic payment ; or
(c) Cafeterias or snack bars for the dispensing of food stuffs and beverages.
(7) “Vending facility manager” means a person who is:
(a) Blind;
(b) Responsible for the day-to-day conduct of the vending facility operation; and
(c) Licensed under ORS 346.510 to 346.570.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 346.520 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3253 (HB 3253-B) Page 5
346.520. (1) For [ the] purposes  of providing persons who are blind with remunerative employ-
ment, enlarging the economic opportunities of [ those] persons who are blind and stimulating [ them]
persons who are  blind  to greater efforts to make themselves self-supporting with independent
livelihoods, persons who are blind and who are licensed under [ the provisions of ] ORS 346.510  to
346.570 by the Commission for the Blind[ , as set  forth in ORS 346.510 to 346.570, shall operate ] have
priority in  managing  vending facilities in or on any public buildings or properties where, in the
discretion of the [ head of  the department or agency ] agency, department or political subdivision
in charge of the maintenance of [ such] the public buildings or properties, [ such] vending facilities
may properly and satisfactorily operate.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 276.385, the [ department or agency in  charge of the maintenance of ]
agency, department or political  subdivision charged with maintaining  a public building or
property  [ in or on which ] where a vending facility is operated under ORS 346.510 to 346.570 may
not:
(a) Charge the commission [ for the Blind ] or persons who are  blind and who are licensed under
the provisions of ORS 346.510 to 346.570 any amount for:
[(a)] (A) Rental of the space [ in or on which ] where the vending facility is operated; [ or]
[(b)] (B) Utility costs incurred in the operation of the vending facility ; or
(C) The priority, right,  permit, license or lease to operate a vending facility in or on the
public building or property.
(b) Require that the commission or the vending facility manager pay to  the agency, de-
partment or  political subdivision any portion of a commission, gratuity or revenue earned
by the vending facility manager from the operation of the vending facility.
(3) Subsection (2)  of this section does not apply to charges imposed by the Department of
Transportation or the Travel Information Council . Subject to  the availability of funds, the de-
partment and the council may refrain from charging any amount for rental of space or utility  costs
described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 14.  ORS 346.530 is amended to read:
346.530. (1) Each [ head of  the department or agency in charge of the maintenance of ] agency,
department or political subdivision charged with maintaining  public buildings or properties
shall:
(a) [Periodically ] Annually notify the  Commission for the Blind in writing of any and all existing
locations where vending facilities are in operation or where vending facilities might properly  and
satisfactorily be operated.
(b) Not less than  30 days prior to the reactivation, leasing, re-leasing, licensing or issuance of
a permit for operation of any vending facility, inform the commission [ for the Blind of such contem-
plated] of the pending action.
(c) Inform the  commission [ for the Blind ] of any locations where [ such] vending facilities are
planned or might properly  and satisfactorily be operated in or about other public buildings or
properties [ as may now or thereafter come ] that are or may be  under the jurisdiction of the agency,
department or [ agency] political subdivision for maintenance[ , such information to be given not less
than 30 days prior to  leasing, re-leasing, licensing or issuance of permit for operation of any vending
facility in such public building or on such property ].
(2) If the commission [ for the Blind makes an offer ] offers to operate a  vending facility under
[the provisions of ] this section and the offer is not accepted for reasons other  than the decision not
to have [ no] a vending facility on the  premises, [ such head of the department or ] the agency , de-
partment or political subdivision shall notify the  commission in writing of the reasons for refusing
[its] the commission’s  offer[ , including but not limited to the  terms and conditions of the offer which
was accepted, if  any ]. The agency, department or political subdivision shall offer the commis-
sion an opportunity to resolve the concerns raised in the written notice.
(3) Any contract or agreement between the commission and an agency, department or  pol-
itical subdivision relating to the operation of a vending  facility entered into subsequent to July
Enrolled House Bill 3253 (HB 3253-B) Page 6
1, 1975, [ which] that is not in compliance with or that is  in violation of ORS [ 346.220 and] 346.510
to 346.570 and section 10 of this 2017 Act , [ shall be ] is null and void.
SECTION 15.  ORS 346.540 is amended to read:
346.540. (1) The Commission for the Blind shall:
(a) [ Make surveys of ] As the  commission determines is necessary, survey  public buildings
or properties to determine [ their] the suitability of the public buildings or properties as locations
for vending facilities to be operated by persons who are blind and  advise the [ heads of departments
or] agencies , departments or political subdivisions  charged  with [ the maintenance of such ] main-
taining the public buildings or properties [ as to their ] of the commission’s  findings.
(b) With the consent  of the [ head of the department or ] agency , department or political sub-
division charged with [ the maintenance of ] maintaining the buildings or properties, establish vend-
ing facilities in those locations [ which] that the  commission [ for the Blind has determined to be ]
determines are  suitable[ , and may enter into leases or licensing agreements therefor ] and enter into
agreements to operate the vending facilities .
(c) Recruit, select, train, license and install qualified persons  who are blind as managers of
[such] vending facilities in public buildings or properties.
(d) Adopt rules as [ it may from time to time deem ] necessary to [ assure] ensure the proper and
satisfactory operation of  [ such] vending facilities[ ,] and for the benefit of vending facility
[operators] managers.
(e) Provide for the continued operation of established vending  facilities if a qualified person who
is blind is not available until a qualified person who is blind is available  for assignment as manager.
(f) Not later than January 15 of each year, submit an annual  report on the performance
of the commission’s business enterprise  program to the interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to health  and human services. The commission shall include with the
report the results  of any surveys made under paragraph (a) of this subsection that were
conducted since the submission of the previous year’s report, and  any refusals from agen-
cies, departments or political subdivisions  to operate vending facilities in public buildings or
properties.
(2) The commission may enter into agreements in compliance with ORS chapter  190 to
operate vending  facilities located in public buildings or on public properties described in
subsection (1)(b) of this section.
[(2)] (3) If the [ head of the department or agency ] agency, department or  political subdivision
charged  with  [ the maintenance of ] maintaining public buildings or properties does not consent to
the establishment of vending facilities in locations in the public building or on the public property
[which were determined suitable by the commission,  that person ] that the commission determines
are suitable, the agency, department or political subdivision shall inform the commission in
writing of the reasons why consent is not given.
[(3) The commission may establish in the State  Treasury a fund from the net proceeds of the op-
eration of vending facilities. Moneys so deposited  including the interest thereon shall be credited by
the State Treasurer to a special checking  account, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Dis-
bursement may be made by check signed by the person designated by the commission. The fund shall
be used for the purposes  of and are continuously appropriated for maintenance and replacement of
equipment, management services, assuring a fair minimum of return to vendors, or for  such other
purposes necessary and proper for the benefit of operators of vending  facilities. Interest earned by the
account shall be credited to the account. ]
SECTION 16.
 ORS 346.550 is amended to read:
346.550. A vending facility operated under the provisions of ORS 346.510 to 346.570 [ shall] must
be used  solely for the vending of [ such] commodities and articles [ as may be ] approved by the Com-
mission for the Blind  and by the [ head of the ] state agency,  department or [ agency] political sub-
division [in charge  of the maintenance of ] charged with maintaining the public building or property
in or on which [ such] the vending facility is operated.
SECTION 17.  ORS 346.560 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3253 (HB 3253-B) Page 7
346.560. The [ operator] vending facility manager  of each vending facility  operated under [ the
provisions of ] ORS 346.510 to 346.570 [ shall be ] is subject to the provisions of any [ and all] policies,
rules, laws and ordinances [ applying] that apply within the territory [ within which such ] where the
vending facility is located , including [ those requiring ] any laws and ordinances that require a li-
cense or permit for the conduct of [ such business or any particular aspect thereof ] any aspect of the
operation of the vending facility .
SECTION 18.  ORS 293.701 is amended to read:
293.701. As used in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Council” means the Oregon Investment Council.
(2) “Investment funds” means:
(a) Public Employees Retirement Fund referred to in ORS 238.660;
(b) Industrial Accident Fund referred to in ORS 656.632;
(c) Consumer and Business Services Fund referred to in ORS 705.145;
(d) Employment Department Special Administrative Fund referred to in ORS 657.822;
(e) Insurance Fund referred to in ORS 278.425;
(f) Funds under the control and administration of the Department of State Lands;
(g) Oregon Student Assistance Fund referred to in ORS 348.570;
(h) Moneys  made available to the Commission for the Blind under ORS 346.270 and [ 346.540]
section 2 of this 2017 Act  or rules adopted thereunder;
(i) Forest Development  Revenue Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.147 and State Forestry
General Obligation Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.280;
(j) Oregon War Veterans’ Fund referred to in ORS 407.495;
(k) Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sinking Account referred to in ORS 407.515;
(L) World War II Veterans’ Compensation Fund;
(m) World War II Veterans’ Bond Sinking Fund;
(n) Funds in the hands of the State Treasurer that are not required to meet current  demands
and that are invested in the Oregon Short Term Fund established under ORS 293.728 or  in another
commingled investment vehicle;
(o) State funds that are not subject to the control and administration of officers  or bodies spe-
cifically designated by law;
(p) Funds derived from the sale of state bonds;
(q) Social Security Revolving Account referred to in ORS 237.490;
(r) Public University Fund established by ORS 352.450;
(s) Local Government Employer Benefit Trust Fund referred to in ORS 657.513;
(t) Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund established by ORS 391.800;
(u) Education Stability Fund established by ORS 348.696;
(v) Deferred Compensation Fund established under ORS 243.411;
(w) Trust for Cultural Development Account established under ORS 359.405; and
(x) The State Library Donation Fund and the Talking Book and Braille  Library Endowment
Fund subaccount established under ORS 357.195.
(3) “Investment officer” means the State Treasurer in the capacity as  investment officer for the
council.
SECTION 19.
(1) The Commission  for the Blind shall provide in any agreement with a
vending facility manager that the  commission shall increase the percentage of net proceeds
collected under section 3 of this 2017 Act by four percent if a  vending facility manager li-
censed under ORS 346.510 to 346.570 does not operate in compliance with the requirements
of the vending facility manager statement described in section 5 of this 2017 Act.
(2) A vending facility manager who is party to an agreement for the operation  of a
vending facility that is in effect on or before the effective date of this 2017 Act is not subject
to sections 5 and 6 of this 2017 Act and may continue to operate pursuant to the agreement
until December 31, 2019.
SECTION 20.
Section 19 of this 2017 Act is repealed on December 31, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 3253 (HB 3253-B) Page 8
SECTION 21. The requirements of sections 5 and 6 of this 2017 Act  and the amendments
to ORS 346.530 by section 14 of this 2017 Act apply to agreements entered into on or after
January 1, 2018.
SECTION 22.
Not later than November 15, 2017, the Commission for the Blind  shall adopt
the rules required under sections 3, 5 and 6 of this 2017  Act and ORS 346.510 and 346.540 by
sections 12 and 15 of this 2017 Act, and may amend the rules thereafter.
SECTION 23. ORS 346.210 and 346.220 are repealed.
SECTION 24. (1) Sections  2, 3, 5 to 8 and 19 of this 2017 Act and the amendments to ORS
293.701, 346.290, 346.510, 346.520, 346.530, 346.540, 346.550 and 346.560 by sections 11 to 18 of this
2017 Act become operative on January 1, 2018.
(2) The Commission for the Blind may take any action before the operative  date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is  necessary to enable the commission to exercise, on
and after the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred  on the commission by sections 2, 3, 5 to 8 and 19 of this 2017
Act and the amendments to ORS 293.701, 346.290, 346.510, 346.520, 346.530, 346.540, 346.550 and
346.560 by sections 11 to 18 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 25.
The amendments to section 3 of this 2017 Act by section 4 of this 2017  Act
become operative on January 1, 2020.
SECTION 26. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House May 24, 2017
Repassed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 3, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3253 (HB 3253-B) Page 9